Illinois, session 104th, HB758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The ID/DD Community Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 47/1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8ID/DD Community Care Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-339, eff. 7-1-10; 97-227, eff. 1-1-12.)